District of Columbia statutes.
29-411.02

Standing.

(a)

A derivative proceeding may be brought in the Superior Court by:

(1)

A member or members having 5% or more of the voting power, or by 50 members, whichever is less; or

(2)

Any director or member of a designated body.

(b)

The plaintiff in a derivative proceeding shall be a member, director, or member of a designated body at the time of bringing the proceeding. A plaintiff that is a member shall also have been a member at the time of any action complained of in the derivative proceeding.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-411.07.